Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-3204
Seizure disorder materials; review by school employees; when required.

Beginning with school year 2022-23, in addition to any other professional development and collegial planning activities for certificated school employees, each certificated school employee shall participate in a minimum of one hour of self-study review of seizure disorder materials at least once in every two school years.

Laws 2021, LB639, § 4.